Vermont, session 2025-2026, H743.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
Consistent with the declaration of policy on minimum wages, set forth in
21 V.S.A. § 381, and to address ongoing concerns about affordability, it is the
General Assembly’s intent to raise the State minimum wage to the livable
wage as reported by the Joint Fiscal Office in January 2025. Future increases
VT LEG #386023 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.743
2026 Page 2 of 3
to the minimum wage will continue to be determined as established by current
law.
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 383 is amended to read:
§ 383. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(5) “Livable wage” means the average of the urban and rural hourly
wage required for a full-time worker who lives in shared housing and has
employer-assisted health insurance to pay for the basic needs budget.
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. § 384 is amended to read:
§ 384. EMPLOYMENT; WAGES
(a)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2022 2027, an employer shall not employ
any employee at a rate of less than $12.55, and on the livable wage of $18.60.
On each subsequent January 1, the minimum wage rate shall be increased by
five percent or the percentage increase of the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U,
U.S. city average, not seasonally adjusted, or successor index, as calculated by
the U.S. Department of Labor or successor agency, rounded to one decimal
point, for the 12 months preceding the previous September 1, whichever is
smaller, but in no event shall the minimum wage be decreased. The minimum
wage shall be rounded off to the nearest $0.01.
* * *
VT LEG #386023 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.743
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386023 v.1